Hawaii statutes.
§382-5 Stevedoring fund; compensation for
appropriation and use. There is appropriated from the general revenues of
the State sufficient moneys as may be necessary, from time to time, for
expenditure by or under the direction of the governor for any and all purposes
of this chapter and the operations of the government under this chapter,
including, without limitation of the generality of the foregoing, the
compensation of employees and for other personal services, other current
expenses, insurance, and expenditures for the performance of any and all
contracts and arrangements authorized by this chapter; provided that the
governor may not expend in excess of $250,000 by this method. The governor may
further augment the appropriation from the governor's contingent fund and in
addition thereto may cause to be expended from the general fund as a loan or
loans further amounts from time to time as required for the purposes of this
chapter, but the amount of such further loans outstanding at any one time shall
not exceed $250,000. Expenditures may be made by or under the direction of the
governor or the governor may allot any money not to exceed the maximums
provided in this section to the designated agency for expenditure upon its own
vouchers.

Charges shall be made and collected for deposit
into the treasury of the State. The charges so far as possible shall be based
upon the rates prevailing in the industry immediately prior to the disruption
of service, but due consideration shall be given to current conditions,
including the expenses and other costs incurred or which may be incurred by the
State under this chapter. From time to time the governor shall pay from the
general fund to each company whose property has been appropriated just
compensation for the appropriation and use of its property. If any company is
unwilling to accept the amount determined by the governor as full and complete
compensation for appropriation and use, the company shall be paid fifty per
cent of the amount so determined by the governor and shall be entitled to sue
the State, in the manner provided in chapter 661 for such additional sum as,
when added to the sum already received by the company, shall constitute just
compensation for the appropriation and use of its property; provided that the
suit shall be instituted within three months after the termination of the
appropriation and use. [L 1951, c 209, pt of §4; RL 1955, §92-6; am L 1964, c
46, §2; HRS §382-5; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next